Utah statutes.
7-1-310.   Subpoena power of commissioner.
The commissioner may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and
the production of books, records, and other papers and documents and may
examine or cause to be examined under oath any officer, director, or employee
of any institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department or any other
person whose testimony he finds relevant to any matter before him or whose
testimony is necessary or appropriate in carrying out his duties and
responsibilities.
